cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Obleky > Smokingy: Smokingová saka; Smokingové kalhoty
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Odijela > Smokinzi: Sakoi za smoking; Hlače za smoking
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Costume > Smochinguri: Jachete de smoching; Pantaloni de smoching
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Κοστούμια (Suits) > Σμόκιν: Σακάκια σμόκιν; Παντελόνια σμόκιν
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Öltönyök > Szmokingok: Szmokingzakók; Szmokingnadrágok
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Костюми > Смокинги: Сака за смокинг; Панталони за смокинг
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Completi > Smoking e abiti da sera: Giacche da smoking; Pantaloni da smoking
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Takım Elbiseler > Smokinler: Smokin ceketleri; Smokin pantolonları
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Pakken > Smokings: Smokingjasjes; Smokingpantalons
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Ternos > Smokings: Paletós de smoking; Calças de smoking
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Anzüge > Smokings: Smoking-Sakkos; Smokinghosen
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Костюмы > Смокинги: Пиджаки для смокинга; Брюки для смокинга
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Puvut > Smokit: Smokkitakit; Smokkihousut
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > สูท > ชุดทักซีโด: เสื้อแจ็คเก็ตทักซิโด้; กางเกงทักซิโด้
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Obleky > Smokingy: Smokingové saká; Smokingové nohavice
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Kostimi > Smokingi: Jakne smoking; Hlače smoking
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Garnitury > Smokingi: Marynarki smokingowe; Spodnie smokingowe
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 정장 > 턱시도: 턱시도 재킷; 턱시도 팬츠
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Jakkesæt > Smokinger: Smokingjakker; Smokingbukser
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Kostiumai > Smokingai: Smokingo švarkai; Smokingo kelnės
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 西装 > 无尾晚礼服: 燕尾服外套; 燕尾服西裤
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Suits > Tuxedos: Tuxedo Jackets; Tuxedo Pants
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Bộ complet > Áo khoác tuxedo: Áo khoác tuxedo; Quần tuxedo
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > スーツ > タキシード: タキシードジャケット; タキシードパンツ
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Kostymer > Smokingar: Smokingkavajer; Smokingbyxor
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Costumes et tailleurs > Smokings: Vestes de smoking; Pantalons de smoking
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Trajes > Esmóquines: Chaquetas de esmoquin; Pantalones de esmoquin
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Dresser > Smoking: Smokingjakker; Smokingbukser
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Fatos > Smoking: Casacos de smoking; Calças de smoking
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 西裝 > 燕尾服: 燕尾服外套; 燕尾服長褲